Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 7. Distributions and Withdrawal

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d Partnership §§ 1299 to 1306, 1314 to 1319, 1361 to 1364, 1406, 1407.

68 C.J.S. Partnership §§ 428, 434 to 436.

§ 17-14-701.
Interim distributions.

Except as provided in this article, a partner is entitled to receive distributions from a limited partnership before his withdrawal from the limited partnership and before the dissolution and winding up thereof to the extent and at the times or upon the happening of the events specified in the partnership agreement.

Amended into (a) by Laws 1995, ch. 45, § 1.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 45, § 2.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 1995, ch. 45, §§ 1, 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-14-702.
Withdrawal of general partner.

A general partner may withdraw from a limited partnership at any time by giving written notice to the other partners, but if the withdrawal violates the partnership agreement, the limited partnership may recover from the withdrawing general partner damages for breach of the partnership agreement and offset the damages against the amount otherwise distributable to him.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

§ 17-14-703.
Withdrawal of limited partner.

A limited partner may withdraw from a limited partnership at the time or upon the happening of events specified in writing in the partnership agreement. If the agreement does not specify in writing the time or the events upon the happening of which a limited partner may withdraw or a definite time for the dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership, a limited partner may withdraw upon not less than six (6) months prior written notice to each general partner at his address on the books of the limited partnership at its office in this state. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to limited partnerships formed under this act prior to July 1, 1999, unless the limited partnership properly adopts the provisions of subsection (b) of this section.

A limited partner may only withdraw from a limited partnership at the time or upon the happening of events specified in writing in the partnership agreement. This subsection applies to limited partnerships formed under this act on or after July 1, 1999. A limited partnership formed under this act prior to July 1, 1999, may adopt the provisions of this subsection by filing a certificate of amendment with the secretary of state after July 1, 1999 that expressly refers to and adopts this subsection.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 1995, ch. 45, § 1; 1999, ch. 145, § 1.

§ 17-14-704.
Distribution upon withdrawal.

Except as provided in this article, upon withdrawal any withdrawing partner is entitled to receive any distribution to which he is entitled under the partnership agreement and, if not otherwise provided in the agreement, he is entitled to receive, within a reasonable time after withdrawal, the fair value of his interest in the limited partnership as of the date of withdrawal based upon his right to share in distributions from the limited partnership.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

§ 17-14-705.
Distribution in kind.

Except as provided in writing in the partnership agreement, a partner, regardless of the nature of his contribution, has no right to demand and receive any distribution from a limited partnership in any form other than cash. Except as provided in writing in the partnership agreement, a partner may not be compelled to accept a distribution of any asset in kind from a limited partnership to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to him exceeds a percentage of that asset which is equal to the percentage in which he shares in distributions from the limited partnership.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 1995, ch. 45, § 1.

§ 17-14-706.
Right to distribution.

At the time a partner becomes entitled to receive a distribution, he has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited partnership with respect to the distribution.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

§ 17-14-707.
Limitations on distribution.

A partner may not receive a distribution from a limited partnership to the extent that, after giving effect to the distribution, all liabilities of the limited partnership, other than liabilities to partners on account of their partnership interests, exceed the fair value of the partnership assets.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

§ 17-14-708.
Liability upon return of contribution.

If a partner has received the return of any part of his contribution without violation of the partnership agreement or this act, he is liable to the limited partnership for a period of one (1) year thereafter for the amount of the returned contribution, but only to the extent necessary to discharge the limited partnership’s liabilities to creditors who extended credit to the limited partnership during the period the contribution was held by the partnership.

If a partner has received the return of any part of his contribution in violation of the partnership agreement or this act, he is liable to the limited partnership for a period of six (6) years thereafter for the amount of the contribution wrongfully returned.

A partner receives a return of his contribution to the extent that a distribution to him reduces his share of the fair value of the net assets of the limited partnership below the value (as set forth in the partnership records required to be kept pursuant to W.S.

17-14-206

) of his contribution which has not been distributed to him.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 1995, ch. 45, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a) and (b), see § 17-14-202(a)(xvi).